Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2142
Appeal; hearing officer; hearing; decision by board; notice; opportunity to present evidence; hearing date.

(1) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal, the chairman or executive secretary of the board may designate a hearing officer from among the board members to hear the appeal or may set the matter for hearing before the full board at its next regular meeting. A majority of the board shall make the decision.

(2) Upon receiving the notice of appeal, the board shall notify all persons served with the order appealed from. Such persons may join in the hearing and give testimony in their own behalf. The board shall set the hearing date on a date not more than fourteen days after receipt of the notice of appeal unless otherwise agreed by the interested parties and the board.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 42;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-5,112.